Utah statutes.
11-41-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Agreement" means an oral or written agreement between a:
(a) (i)  county; or
(ii)  municipality; and
(b)  person.
(2)  "Municipality" means a:
(a)  city; or
(b)  town.
(3)  "Payment" includes:
(a)  a payment;
(b)  a rebate;
(c)  a refund; or
(d)  an amount similar to Subsections (3)(a) through (c).
(4)  "Regional retail business" means a:
(a)  retail business that occupies a floor area of more than 80,000 square
feet;
(b)  dealer as defined in Section 41-1a-102;
(c)  retail shopping facility that has at least two anchor tenants if the
total number of anchor tenants in the shopping facility occupy a total floor
area of more than 150,000 square feet; or
(d)  grocery store that occupies a floor area of more than 30,000 square feet.
(5) (a)  "Sales and use tax" means a tax:
(i)  imposed on transactions within a:
(A)  county; or
(B)  municipality; and
(ii)  except as provided in Subsection (5)(b), authorized under Title 59,
Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (5)(a)(ii), "sales and use tax" does not
include a tax authorized under:
(i)  Subsection 59-12-103(2)(a)(i);
(ii)  Subsection 59-12-103(2)(b)(i);
(iii)  Subsection 59-12-103(2)(c)(i);
(iv)  Subsection 59-12-103(2)(d)(i)(A);
(v)  Section 59-12-301;
(vi)  Section 59-12-352;
(vii)  Section 59-12-353;
(viii)  Section 59-12-603; or
(ix)  Section 59-12-1201.
(6) (a)  "Sales and use tax incentive payment" means a payment of revenues:
(i)  to a person;
(ii)  by a:
(A)  county; or
(B)  municipality;
(iii)  to induce the person to locate or relocate a regional retail business
within the:
(A)  county; or
(B)  municipality; and
(iv)  that are derived from a sales and use tax.
(b)  "Sales and use tax incentive payment" does not include funding for public
infrastructure.
